Utah statutes.
76-5-406.3.   Applicability of sentencing provisions.

A person convicted of a violation of Section 76-5-301.1, child kidnaping; Section 76-5-302, aggravated kidnaping; Section 76-5-402.1, rape of a child; Section 76-5-402.3, object rape of a child; Section 76-5-403.1, sodomy on a child; Section 76-5-404.1, aggravated sexual abuse of a child; or Section 76-5-405, aggravated sexual assault shall be sentenced as follows:

(1)  If the person is sentenced prior to April 29, 1996, he shall be sentenced in accordance with the statutory provisions in effect prior to that date.

(2)  If the person commits the crime and is sentenced on or after April 29, 1996, he shall be punished in accordance with the statutory provisions in effect after April 29, 1996.

(3)  If the person commits the crime prior to April 29, 1996, but is sentenced on or after April 29, 1996, he shall be given the option prior to sentencing to proceed either under the law which was in effect at the time the offense was committed or the law which was in effect at the time of sentencing.  If the person refuses to select, the court shall sentence the person in accordance with the law in effect at the time of sentencing.  The provisions of Subsections 77-27-9(2)(a) and (b) apply to the sentence of any person who selects under this section to be sentenced in accordance with the law in effect prior to April 29, 1996.

